Hawaii statutes.
[§440J-2] Informational reports. (a)
Beginning on March 1, 2013, and on every March 1 thereafter, every provider, except
for commercial mobile radio service providers, shall file with the department,
in a form as prescribed by the director, separate reports for each county that
include, over the most recent thirty-day period and without any other personal
or private information, the following:

(1) Broadband access availability aggregated at the
census-block level and detailed as a percentage of households, addresses, or
tax map key parcels that cannot be serviced in a census-block at the broadband
speed threshold; and

(2) The monthly price charged for the broadband
service if purchased individually without any discounts.

(b) Beginning on March 1, 2013, and on every
March 1 thereafter, commercial mobile radio service providers shall file with
the department data and information that is the same as and not inconsistent
with information filed with the Federal Communications Commission. [L 2012, c
259, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next